Hawaii statutes.
[§134-28] Explosive
devices; prohibitions; penalty. (a) It shall be unlawful for any person
to knowingly or intentionally possess, construct, set off, ignite, discharge,
or otherwise cause to explode any homemade explosive device.

(b) Any person violating this section shall be
guilty of a class C felony.

(c) A violation of this section shall be
construed as an offense distinct from an offense under section 134-8.

(d) For the purposes of this section,
"homemade explosive device" means a non-commercially manufactured
device composed of a single ingredient, or mixture of ingredients, capable of
instantaneously releasing a sufficient amount of energy to inflict substantial
damage to persons or property. [L 2011, c 222, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next